Georgia, session 2025_26, HB344.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 40-6-163 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to duty of driver
of vehicle meeting or overtaking school bus, reporting of violations, and civil monetary
penalty for violations captured by school bus camera, is amended by revising subparagraph
(d)(3)(A) as follows:
"(A) The owner of a motor vehicle shall be liable for a civil monetary penalty to the
governing body of the law enforcement agency provided for in subparagraph (B) of this
paragraph if such vehicle is found, as evidenced by recorded images, to have been
operated in disregard or disobedience of subsection (a) of this Code section and such
H. B. 344
- 1 -

LC 39 4579
disregard or disobedience was not otherwise authorized by law. The amount of such
civil monetary penalty shall be:
(i) For the first violation in a jurisdiction, $300.00;
(ii) For a second violation in a jurisdiction, $500.00; and
(iii) For a third or subsequent violation in a jurisdiction, $1,000.00;"
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 344
- 2 -